tr: raf sistemi konfigürasyonu: Kavisli ön; Çift taraflı raf; Gibraltar stili kavisli ön (genel); Modüler/genişletilebilir; Tek taraflı raf; Düz ön; T çubuk; Diğer
pl: konfiguracja systemu Regały: Zakrzywiony przód; Podwójna rama boczna; Zakrzywiony przód w stylu Gibraltar (uniwersalny); Modułowa/rozszerzalna; Pojedyncza rama boczna; Prosty przód; Rama typu T-bar; Inne
pt-BR: Sistema de rack configuração: Frente curva; Rack de dois lados; Frente curva estilo Gibraltar (genérico); Modular/expansível; Rack de um lado; Frente reta; Barra em T; Outros
en: Rack system configuration: Curved front; Double side rack; Gibraltar-style curved front (generic); Modular/expandable; Single side rack; Straight front; T-bar; Other
cs: Konfigurace systému regálu: Zaoblená přední strana; Dvojitá boční rampa; Zahnutá přední část ve stylu Gibraltar (univerzální); Modulární/rozšiřitelná; Jednoduchá boční rampa; Rovná přední část; Ve tvaru T; Ostatní
zh-CN: 支架系统配置: 弧形前面; 双侧支架; Gibraltar 风格弧形前面（通用）; 模块化/可扩展; 单侧支架; 直形前面; T 形杆; 其他
pt-PT: Configuração do sistema de suporte: Frente curva; Estante de dupla face; Frente curva estilo Gibraltar (genérica); Modular/expansível; Estante de face única; Frente direita; Barra em T; Outro
hu: Állványrendszer-konfiguráció: Íves előlap; Kétoldalas állvány; Gibraltár stílusú íves előlap (általános); Moduláris/bővíthető; Egyoldalas állvány; Egyenes előlap; T-rúd; Egyéb
vi: Cấu hình hệ thống giá đỡ: Mặt trước cong; Giá hai mặt; Mặt trước cong kiểu Gibraltar (tiêu chuẩn); Có thể lắp ghép/mở rộng; Giá một mặt; Mặt trước thẳng; Thanh chữ T; Khác
ja: ラックシステム構成: カーブフロント; ダブルサイドラック; ジブラルタルスタイル カーブフロント (汎用); モジュラー/拡張可能; シングルサイドラック; ストレートフロント; Tバー; その他
it: Configurazione del sistema di scaffali: Frontale curvo; Scaffale su due lati; Frontale curvo stile Gibraltar (generico); Modulare/espandibile; Scaffale singolo; Frontale dritto; T-bar; Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija sistema stojala: Ukrivljena sprednja stran; Dvostransko stojalo; Ukrivljena sprednja stran v slogu Gibraltar (splošno); Modularno/razširljivo; Enostransko stojalo; Ravna sprednja stran; T-profil; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia systému stojana: Zakrivená predná časť; Obojstranný stojan; Zakrivená predná časť v štýle Gibraltar (všeobecná); Modulárne/rozšíriteľné; Jednostranný stojan; Rovná predná časť; T-tyč; Iné
th: การกำหนดค่าระบบห้องอาหาร: ด้านหน้าโค้ง; ชั้นวางแบบสองด้าน; ด้านหน้าโค้งสไตล์ Gibraltar (ทั่วไป); ถอดประกอบ/ขยายได้; ชั้นวางแบบด้านเดียว; ด้านหน้าตรง; ทีบาร์; อื่นๆ
fi: Räkkijärjestelmän kokoonpano: Kaareva etuosa; Kaksipuolinen teline; Gibraltar-tyylinen kaareva etuosa (yleinen); Modulaarinen/laajennettava; Yksipuolinen teline; Suora etuosa; T-tanko; Muu
ro-RO: Configurația sistemului de plute: Partea din față curbată; Suport (rack) pe ambele fețe; Partea din față curbată stil Gibraltar (generic); Modular/extensibil; Suport (rack) pe o singură față; Partea din față dreaptă; Bară în T; Altele
el: Διαμόρφωση συστήματος ραφιών: Καμπυλωτή πρόσοψη; Ράφι διπλής όψης; Καμπυλωτή πρόσοψη τύπου Gibraltar (γενικό); Αρθρωτό/επεκτάσιμο; Ράφι μονής όψης; Επίπεδη πρόσοψη; Σε σχήμα Τ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Конфигурация на стелажна система: Извита предна част; Двустранен стелаж; Извита предна част в стил Gibraltar (стандартна); Модулен/разширяем; Едностранен стелаж; Права предна част; Т-образна стойка; Друго
ru: Конфигурация системы стойки: Изогнутая фронтальная часть; Двойная боковая стойка; Изогнутая фронтальная часть в стиле Gibraltar (универсальная); Модульная/расширяемая; Одинарная боковая стойка; Прямая фронтальная часть; Т-образная перекладина; Другое
nl: Reksysteem configuratie: Gebogen voorkant; Dubbelzijdig rek; Gebogen voorkant in Gibraltar-stijl (algemeen); Modulair/uitbreidbaar; Enkelzijdig rek; Rechte voorkant; T-bar; Overig
da: Racksystemkonfiguration: Buet front; Dobbelt side-rack; Buet front i Gibraltar-stil (generisk); Modulært/udvideligt; Enkelt side-rack; Lige front; T-bar; Andet
de: Regal-Systemkonfiguration: Gebogene Front; Doppelseitiges Rack; Gebogene Front im Gibraltar-Stil (generisch); Modular/Erweiterbar; Einseitiges Rack; Gerade Front; T-Bar; Sonstige
nb: Hyllesystemkonfigurasjon: Buet front; Dobbeltsidig stativ; Buet front i Gibraltar-stil (generisk); Modulær/utvidbar; Enkeltsidig stativ; Rett front; T-stang; Annet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija sustava stalka: Zakrivljena prednja strana; Dvostrani stalak; Zakrivljena prednja strana u stilu Gibraltar (generički); Modularno/proširivo; Jednostrani stalak; Ravna prednja strana; T-šipka; Ostalo
sv: Systemkonfiguration för hyllställ: Svängd framsida; Dubbelsidigt rack; Gibraltar-liknande svängd framsida (generisk); Modulär/expanderbar; Enkelsidigt rack; Rak framsida; T-stång; Övrigt
lt-LT: Stovo sistemos konfigūracija: Lenktas priekis; Dvigubas šoninis stovas; „Gibraltar“ stiliaus lenktas priekis (bendrinis); Modulinis / plečiamas; Viengubas šoninis stovas; Tiesus priekis; T formos skersinis; Kita
zh-TW: 架體系統配置: 弧狀前方; 雙面鼓架; Gibraltar 風格弧狀前方 (通用); 模組化/可擴充; 單面鼓架; 直狀前方; T 型桿; 其他
es: Configuración del sistema de soporte: Frente curvo; Rack de dos lados; Frente curvo estilo Gibraltar (genérico); Modular/expansible; Rack de un lado; Frente recto; Barra en T; Otro
fr: Configuration du système de rack: Avant incurvé; Rack latéral double; Avant incurvé de type Gibraltar (générique); Modulaire/extensible; Rack latéral simple; Avant droit; Barre en T; Autre
ko: 랙 체계 구성: 곡선형 전면; 양면 랙; 지브롤터 스타일 곡선형 전면(일반); 모듈식/확장 가능; 단면 랙; 직선형 전면; T-바; 기타